New Mexico, session 2026, SB168.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the local government division of the department of finance and administration for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 for the Estancia valley solid waste authority to engage in collaboration, planning and design of a recycling site for wind turbine blades. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund.